Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2313.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 15, chapter 5, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-504.01, to read: START_STATUTE15-504.01. Strikes and organized work stoppages; prohibition; remote instruction; funding; appeal; definition A. Notwithstanding any other law, any teacher who is employed by a school district or charter school in this state may not strike or engage in an organized work stoppage against the school district or charter school. A teacher who violates this subsection forfeits all civil service rights, all reemployment rights and any other rights, benefits or privileges that accrue as a result of employment by a school district or charter school in this state. B. Subsection A of this section does not restrict a teacher's right to stop work if the teacher is not acting in concert with one or more other individuals in a strike or an organized work stoppage. C. If a teacher strike or organized work stoppage against a school district or charter school occurs in violation of subsection A of this section, the department of education shall calculate the following for each school district and charter school that is affected: 1. the percentage of the school district's or charter school's student count before the strike or organized work stoppage that is attributable to either: (a) Students who participate in online instruction pursuant to section 15-808. (b) Students who are educated pursuant to an instructional time model that is adopted pursuant to section 15-901.08. 2. The percentage of the school district's or charter school's student count during the strike or organized work stoppage that is attributable to either: (a) Students who participate in online instruction pursuant to section 15-808. (b) Students who are educated pursuant to an instructional time model that is adopted pursuant to section 15-901.08. 3. The increase, if any, of the percentage calculated pursuant to paragraph 2 of this subsection over the percentage calculated pursuant to paragraph 1 of this subsection. 4. For students who are educated pursuant to an instructional time model that is adopted pursuant to section 15-901.08, both of the following: (a) The percentage of instruction that is provided in a remote setting before the strike or organized work stoppage. (b) The percentage of instruction that is provided in a remote setting during the strike or organized work stoppage. (c) The increase, if any, of the percentage calculated pursuant to subdivision (b) of this paragraph over the percentage calculated pursuant to subdivision (a) of this paragraph. D. Notwithstanding any other law, If a teacher strike or organized work stoppage against a school district or charter school occurs in violation of subsection A of this section, the department of education shall reduce the base support level of the school district or charter school as follows: 1. By the percentage calculated pursuant to subsection C, paragraph 3 of this section. 2. By an amount equal to the percentage calculated pursuant to subsection C, paragraph 4, subdivision (c) of this section multiplied by the percentage that is calculated pursuant to subsection C, paragraph 1, subdivision (b) of this section. E. A school district or charter school may appeal any funding reduction pursuant to subsection D of this section to the state board of education. F. For the purposes of this section, "organized work stoppage" means any collective action by two or more teachers to do at least one of the following: 1. Fail to report for duty. 2. Fail to perform the teachers' assigned responsibilities. 3. Interfere with the performance of assigned responsibilities by one or more other employees. END_STATUTE